Oklahoma, session 2025, SB621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-10-206 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any municipal waste combustor subject to oversight under 40


C.F.R., Part 60, Subpart Eb, and regulation by the Department of


Environmental Quality shall be exempt from any subsequent regulation


by the Department of Environmental Quality relating to general-


purpose waste incineration or incineration of specified waste


sources, including, but not limited to: biomedical waste; hospital,


medical, and infectious waste; commercial solid waste; and


industrial solid waste.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 1374 Page 1


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1374 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:12 AM









































Req. No. 1374 Page 2